Tennessee, session 114, HB0532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 50, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A person who employs a minor and who knows or has reasonable cause to
suspect that the minor has been subjected to child sexual abuse or attempted child
sexual abuse in the course of the minor's employment or on the premises of the
employer must report such knowledge or suspicion to the minor's parent within twenty-
four (24) hours of discovering the abuse or attempted abuse. The employer must also
note the specific circumstances warranting the report in the minor's employment file.
(b) A report required by subsection (a) is in addition to any report required by §
37-1-403 or § 37-1-605, if applicable.
(c) Notwithstanding § 50-5-107, this section applies to all persons who employ
unemancipated minors.
(d) Any person who violates subsection (a) shall be subject to a penalty of one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first violation or two thousand dollars ($2,000) for a
second or subsequent violation. All penalties owed under this section shall be paid to
the commissioner of labor and workforce development.
(e) As used in this section, "child sexual abuse" means the same as defined in §
37-1-602.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0532
000086
- 1 -